Utah statutes.
15-2-5.   Blood donation by minor.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, any minor who has reached the
age of eighteen years may give consent to the donation of his blood and to the
necessary medical procedures to accomplish such donation. Consent shall not be
subject to disaffirmance because of minority. The consent of the parent or
parents of a minor shall not be necessary in order to authorize the donation
of blood and such medical procedures.
